test/src/gt-desc-yamls/A-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
      õilis+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: õilsagi
      õilis+A+Sg+Gen: õilsa
      õilis+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: õilsassegi
      õilis+A+Sg+Ill: õilsasse
      õilis+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: õilsaski
      õilis+A+Sg+Ine: õilsas
      õilis+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: õiliski
      õilis+A+Sg+Nom: õilis
      õilis+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: õilsatki
      õilis+A+Sg+Par: õilsat
      õilis+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: õilsakski
      õilis+A+Sg+Tra: õilsaks
      õilis+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: õilsanigi
      õilis+A+Sg+Trm: õilsani
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistetagi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: õndsatetagi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abe+Usage/NotNorm: õnnisteta
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abe: õndsateta
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnisteltki
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: õndsailtki
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: õndsateltki
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistelt
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: õndsailt
      õnnis+A+Pl+Abl: õndsatelt
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistelgi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: õndsailgi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: õndsatelgi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistel
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: õndsail
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ade: õndsatel
      õnnis+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistelegi
      õnnis+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: õndsailegi
      õnnis+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: õndsatelegi
      õnnis+A+Pl+All+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistele
      õnnis+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: õndsaile
      õnnis+A+Pl+All: õndsatele
      õnnis+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistegagi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: õndsategagi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Com+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistega
      õnnis+A+Pl+Com: õndsatega
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistestki
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: õndsaistki
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: õndsatestki
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistest
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: õndsaist
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ela: õndsatest
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistenagi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: õndsatenagi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ess+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistena
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ess: õndsatena
      õnnis+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistegi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: õndsategi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Gen+Usage/NotNorm: õnniste
      õnnis+A+Pl+Gen: õndsate
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistessegi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: õndsaissegi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: õndsatessegi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistesse
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: õndsaisse
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ill: õndsatesse
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnisteski
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: õndsaiski
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: õndsateski
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistes
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: õndsais
      õnnis+A+Pl+Ine: õndsates
      õnnis+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: õndsadki
      õnnis+A+Pl+Nom: õndsad
      õnnis+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: õndsaidki
      õnnis+A+Pl+Par: õndsaid
      õnnis+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistekski
      õnnis+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: õndsaikski
      õnnis+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: õndsatekski
      õnnis+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/NotNorm: õnnisteks
      õnnis+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: õndsaiks
      õnnis+A+Pl+Tra: õndsateks
      õnnis+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: õnnistenigi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: õndsatenigi
      õnnis+A+Pl+Trm+Usage/NotNorm: õnnisteni
      õnnis+A+Pl+Trm: õndsateni
      õnnis+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: õndsatagi
      õnnis+A+Sg+Abe: õndsata
      õnnis+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: õndsaltki
      õnnis+A+Sg+Abl: õndsalt
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: õndsalgi
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ade: õndsal
      õnnis+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: õndsalegi
      õnnis+A+Sg+All: õndsale
      õnnis+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: õndsagagi
      õnnis+A+Sg+Com: õndsaga
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: õndsastki
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ela: õndsast
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: õndsanagi
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ess: õndsana
      õnnis+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: õndsagi
      õnnis+A+Sg+Gen: õndsa
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: õndsassegi
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ill: õndsasse
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: õndsaski
      õnnis+A+Sg+Ine: õndsas
      õnnis+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: õnniski
      õnnis+A+Sg+Nom: õnnis
      õnnis+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: õnnistki
      õnnis+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: õndsatki
      õnnis+A+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: õnnist
      õnnis+A+Sg+Par: õndsat
      õnnis+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: õndsakski
      õnnis+A+Sg+Tra: õndsaks
      õnnis+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: õndsanigi
      õnnis+A+Sg+Trm: õndsani
